test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stakkur
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stakk
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: stakki
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: staks
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stakkar
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: stakkar
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [støkkum, stakkum]
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: stakka
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: stakkurin
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: stakkin
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: stakkinum
    stakkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: staksins
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: stakkarnir
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: stakkarnar
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [støkkunum, stakkunum]
    stakkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: stakkanna
